District of Columbia statutes.
34-1264.04

Rules.

The Mayor, in accordance with the procedures of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 1404
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334